Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-712
Visitation schedule; civil contempt; remedies.

If the court enters a visitation order in a proceeding under sections 30-701 to 30-713, it may set out a visitation schedule including the time, place, and manner of visitation. Failure to comply with the order may be the subject of a civil contempt proceeding and may be subject to remedies under section 30-705. The court may provide for an expiration date or a review date in its order, and such a provision does not affect the appealability of an order under section 30-710.

Laws 2018, LB845, § 12.